Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5860YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2278 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 80B.11I Experienced reserve peace 1 officers. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âBorder state law enforcement agencyâ means a law 4 enforcement agency located in Minnesota, Wisconsin, Illinois, 5 Missouri, South Dakota, or Nebraska that maintains reserve 6 peace officer training, certification, and oversight standards 7 that are substantially equivalent to those required in this 8 state, as determined by the council. 9 b. âBreak in serviceâ means a period exceeding six 10 consecutive months during which a reserve peace officer is not 11 actively appointed by any law enforcement agency. âBreak in 12 serviceâ does not include approved leaves of absence, injury 13 leave, military service, or transitions between agencies when 14 the officer remains in good standing. 15 c. âFounded or sustained disciplinary actionâ means a final 16 determination by an employing agency or certifying authority 17 that a reserve peace officer committed a violation of law, 18 policy, or professional standard warranting formal discipline. 19 2. A certified reserve peace officer may be eligible to 20 attend a shortened or abbreviated law enforcement academy 21 course established by the council pursuant to section 80B.11 if 22 the officer meets all of the following requirements: 23 a. The officer has served as a reserve peace officer for a 24 cumulative total of at least four years with one or more Iowa 25 or border state law enforcement agencies, without a break in 26 service during that period. 27 b. The officer has performed not less than four thousand 28 cumulative hours of documented reserve law enforcement service 29 with one or more Iowa or border state law enforcement agencies. 30 c. The officer has not been the subject of any founded or 31 sustained disciplinary action, suspension, or termination for 32 misconduct during the qualifying period described in paragraphs 33 âaâ and âbâ . 34 3. Each law enforcement agency for which the reserve peace 35 -1- LSB 5860YH (2) 91 as/js 1/ 3 H.F. 2278 officer has served shall, upon request of the officer or the 1 Iowa law enforcement academy, verify and certify the duration, 2 continuity, number of hours, and disciplinary record of the 3 officerâs service for purposes of determining eligibility under 4 subsection 2. 5 4. The council may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 6 to recognize reserve peace officer service performed for law 7 enforcement agencies located in states other than those listed 8 in subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , if the council determines that 9 such agencies maintain training, certification, and oversight 10 standards substantially equivalent to those required in this 11 state. Service recognized under this subsection shall be 12 treated as service with a border state law enforcement agency 13 for purposes of subsection 2. 14 5. The council shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 15 establishing the curriculum, standards, and procedures for the 16 shortened or abbreviated academy course authorized by this 17 section. The curriculum shall ensure that eligible reserve 18 peace officers receive all training necessary to qualify 19 for full peace officer certification while appropriately 20 recognizing prior training and documented reserve service 21 experience. 22